Illinois, session 104th, SB711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Sections 3.5, 3.50, 3.55, and 3.65 6and by adding Section 3.260 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 50/3.5)8    Sec. 3.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Clinical observation" means the ongoing observation of a 10patient's medical or mental health condition by a licensed 11health care professional utilizing a medical skill set while 12continuing assessment and care.13    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 14Health.15    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 16of Public Health.17    "Emergency" means a medical condition of recent onset and 18severity that would lead a prudent layperson, possessing an 19average knowledge of medicine and health, to believe that 20urgent or unscheduled medical care is required.21    "Emergency Medical Services personnel" or "EMS personnel" 22means persons licensed as an Emergency Medical Responder (EMR) 23(First Responder), Emergency Medical Dispatcher (EMD),   SB0711 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1Emergency Medical Technician (EMT), Emergency Medical 2Technician-Intermediate (EMT-I), Advanced Emergency Medical 3Technician (A-EMT), Paramedic (EMT-P), Emergency 4Communications Registered Nurse (ECRN), Pre-Hospital 5Registered Nurse (PHRN), Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice 6Registered Nurse (PHAPRN), or Pre-Hospital Physician Assistant 7(PHPA).8    "Exclusive representative" has the same meaning as defined 9in Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 10    "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing home, 11physician's office or other fixed location at which medical 12and health care services are performed. It does not include 13"pre-hospital emergency care settings" which utilize EMS 14personnel to render pre-hospital emergency care prior to the 15arrival of a transport vehicle, as defined in this Act.16    "Hospital" has the meaning ascribed to that term in the 17Hospital Licensing Act.18    "Labor organization" has the same meaning as defined in 19Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 20    "Medical monitoring" means the performance of medical 21tests and physical exams to evaluate an individual's ongoing 22exposure to a factor that could negatively impact that 23person's health. "Medical monitoring" includes close 24surveillance or supervision of patients liable to suffer 25deterioration in physical or mental health and checks of 26various parameters such as pulse rate, temperature,   SB0711 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1respiration rate, the condition of the pupils, the level of 2consciousness and awareness, the degree of appreciation of 3pain, and blood gas concentrations such as oxygen and carbon 4dioxide.5    "NREMT" means the National Registry of Emergency Medical 6Technicians. 7    "Silver spanner program" means a program in which a member 8under a fire department's or fire protection district's 9collective bargaining agreement works on or at the EMS System 10under another fire department's or fire protection district's 11collective bargaining agreement and (i) the other fire 12department or fire protection district is not the member's 13full-time employer and (ii) any EMS services not included 14under the original fire department's or fire protection 15district's collective bargaining agreement are included in the 16other fire department's or fire protection district's 17collective bargaining agreement. 18    "Trauma" means any significant injury which involves 19single or multiple organ systems.20(Source: P.A. 103-521, eff. 1-1-24; 103-689, eff. 1-1-25.) 21    (210 ILCS 50/3.50)22    Sec. 3.50. Emergency Medical Services personnel licensure 23levels. 24    (a) "Emergency Medical Technician" or "EMT" means a person 25who has successfully completed a course in basic life support   SB0711 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1as approved by the Department, is currently licensed by the 2Department in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act 3and rules adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and 4practices within an EMS System. A valid Emergency Medical 5Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license issued under this Act shall 6continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an Emergency 7Medical Technician (EMT) license until the Emergency Medical 8Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license expires. 9    (b) "Emergency Medical Technician-Intermediate" or "EMT-I" 10means a person who has successfully completed a course in 11intermediate life support as approved by the Department, is 12currently licensed by the Department in accordance with 13standards prescribed by this Act and rules adopted by the 14Department pursuant to this Act, and practices within an 15Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 16    (b-5) "Advanced Emergency Medical Technician" or "A-EMT" 17means a person who has successfully completed a course in 18basic and limited advanced emergency medical care as approved 19by the Department, is currently licensed by the Department in 20accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 21adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 22within an Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 23    (c) "Paramedic (EMT-P)" means a person who has 24successfully completed a course in advanced life support care 25as approved by the Department, is licensed by the Department 26in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules   SB0711 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 2within an Advanced Life Support EMS System. A valid Emergency 3Medical Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license issued under this 4Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as a 5Paramedic license until the Emergency Medical 6Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license expires. 7    (c-5) "Emergency Medical Responder" or "EMR (First 8Responder)" means a person who has successfully completed a 9course in emergency medical response as approved by the 10Department and provides emergency medical response services in 11accordance with the level of care established by the National 12EMS Educational Standards Emergency Medical Responder course 13as modified by the Department, or who provides services as 14part of an EMS System response plan, as approved by the 15Department, of that EMS System. The Department shall have the 16authority to adopt rules governing the curriculum, practice, 17and necessary equipment applicable to Emergency Medical 18Responders.19    On August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 2098-973), a person who is licensed by the Department as a First 21Responder and has completed a Department-approved course in 22first responder defibrillator training based on, or equivalent 23to, the National EMS Educational Standards or other standards 24previously recognized by the Department shall be eligible for 25licensure as an Emergency Medical Responder upon meeting the 26licensure requirements and submitting an application to the   SB0711 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1Department. A valid First Responder license issued under this 2Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an 3Emergency Medical Responder license until the First Responder 4license expires.5    (c-10) All EMS Systems and licensees shall be fully 6compliant with the National EMS Education Standards, as 7modified by the Department in administrative rules, within 24 8months after the adoption of the administrative rules. 9    (d) The Department shall have the authority and 10responsibility to:11        (1) Prescribe education and training requirements, 12    which includes training in the use of epinephrine, for all 13    levels of EMS personnel except for EMRs, based on the 14    National EMS Educational Standards and any modifications 15    to those curricula specified by the Department through 16    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.17            (A) A failure rate per course of 30% or greater at 18        the first attempt on the licensure examination shall 19        require the EMS System to submit a quality improvement 20        plan to the Department. The EMS System shall share 21        failure rates with the EMS Lead Instructor quarterly. 22        Neither the EMS System nor the Department may take 23        licensure action against an EMS Lead Instructor based 24        solely on first-attempt pass rates.25            (B) Candidates shall complete the licensure 26        examination within the timeline required by the NREMT.   SB0711 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1            (C) An accredited Paramedic program shall be 2        conducted only by an EMS System or an academic 3        institution whose curriculum has been approved by the 4        EMS System. An EMS System associate hospital may allow 5        students from an EMS System-approved and 6        Department-approved Paramedic course to complete 7        clinical rotations as approved by the EMS System 8        Medical Director. The approval by the EMS System 9        Medical Director may not be unreasonably denied.10        (2) Prescribe licensure testing requirements for all 11    levels of EMS personnel, which shall include a requirement 12    that all phases of instruction, training, and field 13    experience be completed before taking the appropriate 14    licensure examination. Candidates shall may elect to take 15    the appropriate National Registry examination in lieu of 16    the Department's examination, but are responsible for 17    making their own arrangements for taking the National 18    Registry examination. In prescribing licensure testing 19    requirements for honorably discharged members of the armed 20    forces of the United States under this paragraph (2), the 21    Department shall ensure that a candidate's military 22    emergency medical training, emergency medical curriculum 23    completed, and clinical experience, as described in 24    paragraph (2.5), are recognized. 25        (2.5) Review applications for EMS personnel licensure 26    from honorably discharged members of the armed forces of   SB0711 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1    the United States with military emergency medical 2    training. Applications shall be filed with the Department 3    within one year after military discharge and shall 4    contain: (i) proof of successful completion of military 5    emergency medical training; (ii) a detailed description of 6    the emergency medical curriculum completed; and (iii) a 7    detailed description of the applicant's clinical 8    experience. The Department may request additional and 9    clarifying information. The Department shall evaluate the 10    application, including the applicant's training and 11    experience, consistent with the standards set forth under 12    subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 3.10. If the 13    application clearly demonstrates that the training and 14    experience meet such standards, the Department shall offer 15    the applicant the opportunity to successfully complete a 16    Department-approved EMS personnel examination for the 17    level of license for which the applicant is qualified. 18    Upon passage of an examination, the Department shall issue 19    a license, which shall be subject to all provisions of 20    this Act that are otherwise applicable to the level of EMS 21    personnel license issued. 22        (3) License individuals as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 23    or Paramedic who have met the Department's education, 24    training and examination requirements.25        (4) Prescribe annual continuing education and 26    relicensure requirements for all EMS personnel licensure   SB0711 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1    levels. 2        (5) Relicense individuals as an EMD, EMR, EMT, EMT-I, 3    A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic every 4 years, 4    based on their compliance with continuing education and 5    relicensure requirements as required by the Department 6    pursuant to this Act. Every 4 years, a Paramedic shall 7    have 100 hours of approved continuing education, an EMT-I 8    and an advanced EMT shall have 80 hours of approved 9    continuing education, and an EMT shall have 60 hours of 10    approved continuing education. An Illinois licensed EMR, 11    EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, or 12    PHRN whose license has been expired for less than 36 13    months may apply for reinstatement by the Department. 14    Reinstatement shall require that the applicant (i) submit 15    satisfactory proof of completion of continuing medical 16    education and clinical requirements to be prescribed by 17    the Department in an administrative rule; (ii) submit a 18    positive recommendation from an Illinois EMS Medical 19    Director attesting to the applicant's qualifications for 20    retesting; and (iii) pass a Department approved test for 21    the level of EMS personnel license sought to be 22    reinstated.23        (6) Grant inactive status to any EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, 24    A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who 25    qualifies, based on standards and procedures established 26    by the Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act.  SB0711 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1        (7) Charge a fee for EMS personnel examination, 2    licensure, and license renewal.3        (8) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the 4    license of any licensee, after an opportunity for an 5    impartial hearing before a neutral administrative law 6    judge appointed by the Director, where the preponderance 7    of the evidence shows one or more of the following:8            (A) The licensee has not met continuing education 9        or relicensure requirements as prescribed by the 10        Department;11            (B) The licensee has failed to maintain 12        proficiency in the level of skills for which he or she 13        is licensed;14            (C) The licensee, during the provision of medical 15        services, engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or 16        unprofessional conduct of a character likely to 17        deceive, defraud, or harm the public;18            (D) The licensee has failed to maintain or has 19        violated standards of performance and conduct as 20        prescribed by the Department in rules adopted pursuant 21        to this Act or his or her EMS System's Program Plan;22            (E) The licensee is physically impaired to the 23        extent that he or she cannot physically perform the 24        skills and functions for which he or she is licensed, 25        as verified by a physician, unless the person is on 26        inactive status pursuant to Department regulations;  SB0711 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1            (F) The licensee is mentally impaired to the 2        extent that he or she cannot exercise the appropriate 3        judgment, skill and safety for performing the 4        functions for which he or she is licensed, as verified 5        by a physician, unless the person is on inactive 6        status pursuant to Department regulations;7            (G) The licensee has violated this Act or any rule 8        adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act; or9            (H) The licensee has been convicted (or entered a 10        plea of guilty or nolo contendere) by a court of 11        competent jurisdiction of a Class X, Class 1, or Class 12        2 felony in this State or an out-of-state equivalent 13        offense. 14        (9) Prescribe education and training requirements in 15    the administration and use of opioid antagonists for all 16    levels of EMS personnel based on the National EMS 17    Educational Standards and any modifications to those 18    curricula specified by the Department through rules 19    adopted pursuant to this Act. 20    (d-5) An EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, 21PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who is a member of the Illinois National 22Guard or an Illinois State Trooper or who exclusively serves 23as a volunteer for units of local government with a population 24base of less than 5,000 or as a volunteer for a not-for-profit 25organization that serves a service area with a population base 26of less than 5,000 may submit an application to the Department   SB0711 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1for a waiver of the fees described under paragraph (7) of 2subsection (d) of this Section on a form prescribed by the 3Department. 4    (d-10) A person who is not an EMS personnel may operate an 5EMS vehicle pursuant to this Act if the following requirements 6are met: (i) the person meets the requirements of Section 711-1421 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; (ii) 2 8Department-licensed EMS personnel are present and have met 9educational requirements prescribed by the Department; and 10(iii) the clinical condition of the patient necessitates the 11involvement of additional licensed personnel to ensure 12appropriate assessment, treatment, and patient safety. If a 13waiver is issued by the Department, the person who is not an 14EMS personnel may operate the EMS vehicle if only one EMS 15personnel is present. Upon request, the Department may issue a 16retroactive waiver when appropriate. 17    The education requirements prescribed by the Department 18under this Section must allow for the suspension of those 19requirements in the case of a member of the armed services or 20reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 21National Guard who is on active duty pursuant to an executive 22order of the President of the United States, an act of the 23Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor at 24the time that the member would otherwise be required to 25fulfill a particular education requirement. Such a person must 26fulfill the education requirement within 6 months after his or   SB0711 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1her release from active duty. 2    (e) In the event that any rule of the Department or an EMS 3Medical Director that requires testing for drug use as a 4condition of the applicable EMS personnel license conflicts 5with or duplicates a provision of a collective bargaining 6agreement that requires testing for drug use, that rule shall 7not apply to any person covered by the collective bargaining 8agreement.9    (f) At the time of applying for or renewing his or her 10license, an applicant for a license or license renewal may 11submit an email address to the Department. The Department 12shall keep the email address on file as a form of contact for 13the individual. The Department shall send license renewal 14notices electronically and by mail to a licensee who provides 15the Department with his or her email address. The notices 16shall be sent at least 60 days prior to the expiration date of 17the license. 18(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-153, eff. 1-1-20; 19102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-623, eff. 8-27-21.) 20    (210 ILCS 50/3.55)21    Sec. 3.55. Scope of practice. 22    (a) Any person currently licensed as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, 23A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic may perform emergency 24and non-emergency medical services as defined in this Act, in 25accordance with his or her level of education, training and   SB0711 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1licensure, the standards of performance and conduct prescribed 2by the Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act, and 3the requirements of the EMS System in which he or she 4practices, as contained in the approved Program Plan for that 5System. The Director may, by written order, temporarily modify 6individual scopes of practice in response to public health 7emergencies for periods not exceeding 180 days. 8    (a-5) EMS personnel who have successfully completed a 9Department approved course in automated defibrillator 10operation and who are functioning within a Department approved 11EMS System may utilize such automated defibrillator according 12to the standards of performance and conduct prescribed by the 13Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act and the 14requirements of the EMS System in which they practice, as 15contained in the approved Program Plan for that System.16    (a-7) An EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or 17Paramedic who has successfully completed a Department approved 18course in the administration of epinephrine shall be required 19to carry epinephrine with him or her as part of the EMS 20personnel medical supplies whenever he or she is performing 21official duties as determined by the EMS System. The 22epinephrine may be administered from a glass vial, 23auto-injector, ampule, or pre-filled syringe. 24    (b) An EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or 25Paramedic may practice as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 26Paramedic or utilize his or her EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN,   SB0711 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic license in pre-hospital or 2inter-hospital emergency care settings or non-emergency 3medical transport situations, under the written or verbal 4direction of the EMS Medical Director. For purposes of this 5Section, a "pre-hospital emergency care setting" may include a 6location, that is not a health care facility, which utilizes 7EMS personnel to render pre-hospital emergency care prior to 8the arrival of a transport vehicle. The location shall include 9communication equipment and all of the portable equipment and 10drugs appropriate for the EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 11Paramedic's level of care, as required by this Act, rules 12adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and the 13protocols of the EMS Systems, and shall operate only with the 14approval and under the direction of the EMS Medical Director.15    This Section shall not prohibit an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 16PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic from practicing within an 17emergency department or other health care setting for the 18purpose of receiving continuing education or training approved 19by the EMS Medical Director. This Section shall also not 20prohibit an EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or 21Paramedic from seeking credentials other than his or her EMT, 22EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic license and 23utilizing such credentials to work in emergency departments or 24other health care settings under the jurisdiction of that 25employer.26    (c) An EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic   SB0711 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1may honor Do Not Resuscitate (DNR) orders and powers of 2attorney for health care only in accordance with rules adopted 3by the Department pursuant to this Act and protocols of the EMS 4System in which he or she practices.5    (d) A student enrolled in a Department approved EMS 6personnel program, while fulfilling the clinical training and 7in-field supervised experience requirements mandated for 8licensure or approval by the System and the Department, may 9perform prescribed procedures under the direct supervision of 10a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its 11branches, a qualified registered professional nurse, or 12qualified EMS personnel, only when authorized by the EMS 13Medical Director. A student enrolled in an EMT class may take 14the Department-approved EMR licensure exam after the student 15has completed the first 40 hours of the EMS System-approved 16and Department-approved EMT course. 17    (e) An EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or 18Paramedic may transport a police dog injured in the line of 19duty to a veterinary clinic or similar facility if there are no 20persons requiring medical attention or transport at that time. 21For the purposes of this subsection, "police dog" means a dog 22owned or used by a law enforcement department or agency in the 23course of the department or agency's work, including a search 24and rescue dog, service dog, accelerant detection canine, or 25other dog that is in use by a county, municipal, or State law 26enforcement agency.   SB0711 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1    (f) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit an 2EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, or PHRN from completing an 3initial Occupational Safety and Health Administration 4Respirator Medical Evaluation Questionnaire on behalf of fire 5service personnel, as permitted by his or her EMS System 6Medical Director.7    (g) An EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, PHRN, PHAPRN, or PHPA 8shall be eligible to work for another EMS System for a period 9not to exceed 2 weeks if the individual is under the direct 10supervision of another licensed individual operating at the 11same or higher level as the EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, 12PHRN, PHAPRN, or PHPA; obtained approval in writing from the 13EMS System's Medical Director; and tests into the EMS System 14based upon appropriate standards as outlined in the EMS System 15Program Plan. The EMS System within which the EMT, EMT-I, 16A-EMT, Paramedic, PHRN, PHAPRN, or PHPA is seeking to join 17must make all required testing available to the EMT, EMT-I, 18A-EMT, Paramedic, PHRN, PHAPRN, or PHPA within 2 weeks after 19the written request. Failure to do so by the EMS System shall 20allow the EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, PHRN, PHAPRN, or PHPA 21to continue working for another EMS System until all required 22testing becomes available. 23    (h) A member of a fire department's or fire protection 24district's collective bargaining unit shall be eligible to 25work under a silver spanner program for another EMS System's 26fire department or fire protection district that is not the   SB0711 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1full-time employer of that member, for a period not to exceed 2 2weeks, if the member: (1) is under the direct supervision of 3another licensed individual operating at the same or higher 4licensure level as the member; (2) made a written request to 5the EMS System's Medical Director for approval to work under 6the silver spanner program, which shall be approved or denied 7within 24 hours after the EMS System's Medical Director 8received the request; and (3) tests into the EMS System based 9upon appropriate standards as outlined in the EMS System 10Program Plan. The EMS System within which the member is 11seeking to join must make all required testing available to 12the member within 2 weeks of the written request. Failure to do 13so by the EMS System shall allow the member to continue working 14under a silver spanner program until all required testing 15becomes available.16(Source: P.A. 102-79, eff. 1-1-22; 103-521, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-547, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 18    (210 ILCS 50/3.65)19    Sec. 3.65. EMS Lead Instructor. 20    (a) "EMS Lead Instructor" means a person who has 21successfully completed a course of education as approved by 22the Department, and who is currently approved by the 23Department to coordinate or teach education, training and 24continuing education courses, in accordance with standards 25prescribed by this Act and rules adopted by the Department   SB0711 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1pursuant to this Act.2    (b) The Department shall have the authority and 3responsibility to:4        (1) Prescribe education requirements for EMS Lead 5    Instructor candidates through rules adopted pursuant to 6    this Act.7        (2) Prescribe testing requirements for EMS Lead 8    Instructor candidates through rules adopted pursuant to 9    this Act.10        (3) Charge each candidate for EMS Lead Instructor a 11    fee to be submitted with an application for an 12    examination, an application for licensure, and an 13    application for relicensure.14        (4) Approve individuals as EMS Lead Instructors who 15    have met the Department's education and testing 16    requirements.17        (5) Require that all education, training and 18    continuing education courses for EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 19    Paramedic, PHRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, ECRN, EMR, and Emergency 20    Medical Dispatcher be coordinated by at least one approved 21    EMS Lead Instructor. A program which includes education, 22    training or continuing education for more than one type of 23    personnel may use one EMS Lead Instructor to coordinate 24    the program, and a single EMS Lead Instructor may 25    simultaneously coordinate more than one program or course. 26    An EMS Lead Instructor may oversee a paramedic with at   SB0711 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1    least 3 years of experience to teach EMT classes, with a 2    licensed teacher, in high schools. High school students 3    electing to not take the National Registry of Emergency 4    Medical Technicians (NREMT) Certification exam shall not 5    be accounted for in calculating the course pass rate by 6    the EMS System or Department. 7        (6) Provide standards and procedures for awarding EMS 8    Lead Instructor approval to persons previously approved by 9    the Department to coordinate such courses, based on 10    qualifications prescribed by the Department through rules 11    adopted pursuant to this Act.12        (7) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the 13    approval of an EMS Lead Instructor, after an opportunity 14    for a hearing, when findings show one or more of the 15    following:16            (A) The EMS Lead Instructor has failed to conduct 17        a course in accordance with the curriculum prescribed 18        by this Act and rules adopted by the Department 19        pursuant to this Act; or20            (B) The EMS Lead Instructor has failed to comply 21        with protocols prescribed by the Department through 22        rules adopted pursuant to this Act.23    (c) To be eligible for an EMS Lead Instructor license, the 24applicant shall meet at least the following minimum experience 25and education requirements and shall provide a written 26recommendation from the EMS Medical Director of the primary   SB0711 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1EMS System affiliation: 2        (1) a current Illinois license as an EMD, EMT, EMT-I, 3    A-EMT, Paramedic, RN, PHRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, or physician; 4        (2) a minimum of 2 years of experience in EMS or 5    emergency care; 6        (3) at least 6 hours of teaching hours audited by a 7    current EMS Lead Instructor; 8        (4) documented EMS classroom teaching experience with 9    a recommendation for EMS Lead Instructor licensure by an 10    EMS Medical Director; and 11        (5) documented successful completion of the National 12    Standard Curriculum for EMS Instructors, or its 13    equivalent, as approved by the Department. 14(Source: P.A. 103-689, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    (210 ILCS 50/3.260 new)16    Sec. 3.260. Emergency Medical Services bridge programs.17    (a) As used in this Section, "stakeholders" include, but 18are not limited to, members representing private ground 19ambulance providers throughout this State representing 20for-profit and nonprofit rural and urban ground ambulance 21providers; the State Board of Education, the Illinois 22Community College Systems, and the University of Illinois 23Systems; the Illinois Board of Higher Education; and the 24Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity.25    (b) The Department of Public Health shall facilitate   SB0711 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07009 BAB 17046 b1gathering stakeholders to review and provide recommendations 2on the development of bridge programs that encourage and allow 3individuals licensed as certified nursing assistants to 4transition to careers as EMS personnel and a bridge program 5that encourages and allows EMS personnel to transition to 6careers as nursing professionals licensed under the Nurse 7Practice Act.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.